District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.116

Repealed

Procedure for issuance of certificate of revocation.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 226, ch. 269, § 116
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 571, Pub. L. 85-254, § 29
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.116.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.17.
1973 Ed., § 29-934c.